Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-106, as
last amended by Section 5, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-106), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-106. A. 1. Every application for a driver license
or identification card shall be made by the applicant upon a form
furnished by Service Oklahoma.
2. Every original, renewal, or replacement application for a
driver license or identification card made by a male applicant who
is at least sixteen (16) but less than twenty-six (26) years of age
shall include a statement that by submitting the application, the
applicant is consenting to registration with the Selective Service
System. The pertinent information from the application shall be
forwarded by Service Oklahoma to the Data Management Center of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4058 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Sele ctive Service System in order to register the applicant as
required by law with the Selective Service System. Any applicant
refusing to sign the consent statement shall be denied a driver
license or identification card.
3. Except as provided for in subsections G and H of this
section, every applicant for a driver license or identification card
shall provide to Service Oklahoma at the time of application a
document showing proof of identity. Service Oklahoma shall
promulgate rules prescribing forms of identification acceptable for
an original Oklahoma driver license.
B. Every applicant for a driver license shall provide the
following information:
1. Full name;
2. Date of birth;
3. Sex;
4. Address of principal residence and county of such residence
which shall be referenced on the REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card; proof of principal residency, as prescribed by
rules promulgated by Service Oklahoma, documenting provided address;
5. Current and complete mailing address to be maintained by
Service Oklahoma for the purpose of giving notice, if necessary, as
required by Section 2-116 of this title;
6. Medical information, as determined by the Department, which
shall assure Service Oklahoma that the person is not prohibited from
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4058 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

bein g licensed as provided by paragraph 7 of subsection A of Section
6-103 of this title;
7. Whether the applicant is deaf or hard-of-hearing;
8. A brief description of the applicant, as determined by the
Department;
9. Whether the applicant has previously been licensed, and, if
so, when and by what state or country, and whether any license has
ever been suspended or revoked, or whether an application has ever
been refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension,
revocation or refusal;
10. Whether the applicant is an alien eligible to be considered
for licensure and is not prohibited from licensure pursuant to
paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title;
11. Whether the applicant has:
a. previously been licensed and, if so, when and by what
state or country, and
b. held more than one license at the same time during the
immediately preceding ten (10) years; and
12. Social Security number.
No person shall request Service Oklahoma to use the Social Security
number of that person as the driver license number. Upon renewal or
replacement of any driver license issued after the effective date of
this act, the licensee shall advise Service Oklahoma or the licensed
operator if the present driver license number of the licensee is the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4058 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Soci al Security number of the licensee. If the driver license
number is the Social Security number, Service Oklahoma or the
licensed operator shall change the driver license number to a
computer-generated alphanumeric identification.
C. 1. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B
of this section, every applicant for a commercial driver license who
is subject to the requirements of 49 C.F.R., Part 391, and is
applying for an original, renewal, or replacement license, and every
person who, upon or after May 8, 2012, is currently the holder of a
commercial driver license and is subject to the requirements of 49
C.F.R., Part 391, and who does not apply for a renewal or
replacement license prior to January 30, 2014, shall submit to
Service Oklahoma and maintain with Service Oklahoma a current
approved medical examination certificate signed by a licensed
physician authorized to perform and approve medical examination
certifications. Service Oklahoma shall adopt rules for maintaining
medical examination certificates pursuant to the requirements in 49
C.F.R., Parts 383 and 384. Any commercial driver licensee subject
to the requirements of this paragraph who fails to maintain on file
with Service Oklahoma a current, approved medical examination
certificate shall have the driving privileges of the person
downgraded to a Class D driver license by Service Oklahoma.
2. If the applicant is applying for an original commercial
driver license in Oklahoma or is transferring a commercial driver
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4058 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

lice nse from another state to Oklahoma, Service Oklahoma shall
review the driving record of the applicant in other states for the
immediately preceding ten (10) years, unless the record review has
already been performed by Service Oklahoma. As a result of the
review, if it is determined by Service Oklahoma that the applicant
is subject to a period of disqualification as prescribed by Section
6-205.2 of this title which has not yet been imposed, Service
Oklahoma shall impose the period of disqualification and the
applicant shall serve the period of disqualification before a
commercial driver license is issued to the applicant; provided,
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent the issuance
of a Class D driver license to the applicant.
3. If the applicant has or is applying for a hazardous material
endorsement, the applicant shall submit to a security threat
assessment performed by the Transportation Security Administration
of the Department of Homeland Security as required by and pursuant
to 49 C.F.R., Part 1572, which shall be used to determine whether
the applicant is eligible for the endorsement pursuant to federal
law and regulation.
4. Service Oklahoma shall notify each commercial driving school
of the passage of this section, and each commercial driving school
shall notify prospective students of its school of the hazardous
material endorsement requirement.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4058 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B of
this section, every applicant shall:
1. Shall be given an option on the application for issuance of
a driver license or identification card or renewal pursuant to
Section 6-115 of this title to provide an emergency contact person.
The emergency contact information requested may include full name,
address, and phone number. The emergency contact information shall
be maintained by Service Oklahoma and shall be used by Service
Oklahoma and law enforcement for emergency purposes only. A person
listed as an emergency contact may request to be removed at any
time. Any update to a change of name, address, or phone number may
be made by the applicant listing the emergency contact person or by
the person listed as the emergency contact; and
2. Shall be given the option on the application for issuance or
renewal of a driver license or identification card to include his or
her blood type on the driver license or identification card.
E. Whenever application is received from a person previously
licensed in another jurisdiction, Service Oklahoma shall request a
copy of the driving record from the other jurisdiction and,
effective September 1, 2005, from all other jurisdictions in which
the person was licensed within the immediately previous ten (10)
years. When received, the driving record shall become a part of the
driving record of the person in this state with the same force and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4058 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

effe ct as though entered on the driver's record in this state in the
original instance.
F. Whenever Service Oklahoma receives a request for a driving
record from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be
forwarded without charge.
G. A person shall not apply for or possess more than one state-
issued or territory-issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-101 of
this title. A valid and unexpired Oklahoma driver license shall
serve as both primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever
application for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card is
submitted to Service Oklahoma. The provisions of subsection B of
Section 1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not apply
when issuing an identification card pursuant to the provisions of
this subsection. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.
H. A valid and unexpired U.S. passport shall serve as both
primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever application for a
driver license or identification card is submitted to the
Department. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
April 13, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4058 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)